Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 1 WILDLIFE - GENERAL PROVISIONS
33-1-105.5. Acquisition of property - procedure.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, before the commission purchases any fee title interest in real property or any interest in water pursuant to section 33-1-105 (1)(a), it shall solicit bid proposals from all interested parties through the issuance of a request for proposals. Notice of such request for proposals shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the commission plans to purchase the real property or interest in water.

The notices required to be published pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following information:

The approximate amount of money available to the commission for the type of property, interest in water, and habitat to be acquired;

The nature of the wildlife habitat, other property, or interest in water desired, including the type or types of recreational opportunities, if any;

The expected terms and conditions of the proposed acquisitions;

The name, address, and phone number of a contact person employed by the division who shall be responsible for providing further information relating to the bid process to any interested party;

The deadlines for the submission of proposals and the address where proposals are to be sent; and

Any other information deemed relevant by the commission.

All proposals received by the commission shall be opened in a manner which is designed to prevent the disclosure of the offering price information contained in such proposals to competing bidders. Once a successful bidder has been selected and the acquisition is completed, the acquisition price and any other information deemed relevant by the commission shall be made available to the public.

The commission, or its designee, may conduct discussions with any person who submits a proposal pursuant to this section for the purpose of clarifying whether the bidder is responsive to, or has a full understanding of, the solicitation requirements. The commission, or its designee, shall, at the request of any person making a proposal, unless it deems such proposal nonresponsive to the bid solicitation, assist such person in restructuring the proposal for the purpose of making the most attractive possible proposal. Bidders shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and revision of proposals. The commission, or its designee, shall not disclose any information regarding the offering prices of other proposals during the course of such discussions. Bidders may submit revisions to proposals after the initial submission of the proposal, so long as such revisions are made prior to the date listed in the request for proposals for final submission of all proposals. The commission has the right to reject any and all bids.

The commission shall evaluate the proposals based on the following criteria:

Whether the ability of the commission to attain the goals established in the long-range plan of the division is enhanced by the acquisition of the property or interest in water;

Whether the acquisition results in the establishment of additional wildlife habitat or in the potential for additional habitat through the use of habitat improvement methods;

Whether the acquisition will improve access to other public lands;

Whether additional wildlife-oriented recreational opportunities will result from the acquisition;

The size and location of the property or interest in water, including the proximity of the property or interest in water to other property controlled by the division; and

Such other criteria as the commission may establish.

Prior to acceptance of proposals by the commission, said proposals must be reviewed by boards of commissioners of counties with lands or water included in the proposals.

The commission may decide not to use the bid process established in this section when the property or interest in water being purchased is located in such proximity to other property controlled by the division that, in the judgment of the commission, the bid process would not be effective, or when the property or interest in water to be purchased is offered through foreclosure, receivership, or auction, or when the property or interest in water is to be purchased from another governmental entity. In the event that the bid process is not used, the purchase of any fee title interest in real property or any interest in water shall be approved by the general assembly acting by bill.

The commission may adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the acquisition process established in this section.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the commission shall include in its annual report, which report shall be submitted to the capital development committee and to the agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee of the senate, a listing of all acquisitions of real property or interests in water made pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such report shall describe all property and interests in water acquired since July 1, 1992, the acquisition cost of each such property or interest in water, and the appraised value of each such property or interest in water, and shall contain a description of all pending acquisitions of property and interests in water.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1898, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1791, § 82, effective June 6.

L. 95:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 1010, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2000:

(10) amended, p. 397, § 2, effective April 11.

L. 2004:

(10) repealed, p. 417, § 4, effective April 13.

L. 2017:

(9) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1064, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Prior to the recreation and reenactment of this section, subsection (10) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 15, 1995. (See L. 92, p. 1898.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration and acquisition authorization for the Frisco Creek wildlife hospital and rehabilitation center contained in the 2004 act repealing subsection (10), see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 135, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

33-1-106. Authority to regulate taking, possession, and use of wildlife - rules.

In order to provide an adequate, flexible, and coordinated statewide system of wildlife management and to maintain adequate and proper populations of wildlife species, the commission shall have authority in this state, by appropriate rules and regulations, to:

Determine under what circumstances, when, in which localities, by what means, what sex of, and in what amounts and numbers the wildlife of this state may be taken and, further, to shorten, extend, or close seasons on any species of wildlife in any specific locality or the entire state when it finds after investigation that such action is necessary to assure maintenance of adequate populations of wildlife or to preserve the proper ecological balance of the environment. In no event, however, shall the commission adopt any regulation concerning the taking of black bears which is in conflict with the provisions of section 33-4-101.3.

Provide for the disposal of the usable portions of wildlife confiscated, abandoned, or unclaimed at meat processing and storage facilities or by taxidermists or otherwise obtained under the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title;

Control the exportation, importation, transportation, release, possession, sale, transfer, and donation of wildlife;

Establish requirements for persons who are engaged in the business of buying, selling, processing, or otherwise handling wildlife for the keeping of records of such transactions and to make such records available for inspection;

Provide for the issuance of and require persons to obtain licenses for the purpose of hunting, fishing, trapping, taking, or possession of wildlife in accordance with the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

Authorize fishing without a license on a statewide basis for up to two days during the calendar year.

The commission shall adopt rules which regulate the conduct of fishing contests in public waters of the state. Such rules may prohibit the holding of such a contest on specific waters and at specific times of the year, but such rules shall not unreasonably restrict persons conducting such a contest from charging an entry fee, awarding prizes to participants, or using marked or tagged fish.

The state agricultural commission shall review the rules concerning captive wild ungulates submitted by the division and make recommendations to the parks and wildlife commission concerning the rules. The parks and wildlife commission shall not pass nor implement rules concerning captive wild ungulates without the approval of the state agricultural commission. If the parks and wildlife commission makes the possession of red deer unlawful in this state, the division shall compensate any person who owns or possesses any red deer on the effective date of the prohibition for the cost to replace such red deer with a legal elk of the same sex and comparable age.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "captive wild ungulates" means wildlife which are ungulates lawfully acquired and held in confinement for breeding for agricultural purposes, production of meat, or other animal products; except that "captive wild ungulates" does not include wildlife held or used for the purpose of hunting or domestic elk or fallow deer held by persons licensed pursuant to section 35-41.5-104, C.R.S.

Captive wild mammals and alternative livestock which have escaped from an owner's control may be removed from the wild by the division of parks and wildlife at the owner's expense, but not sooner than seventy-two hours after the division has given the owner or his designee actual notice of such escape, or the owner has notified the division of such escape. The amount the division of parks and wildlife may charge an owner shall be limited to actual costs incurred by the division to accomplish such removal, subject to further limitation by the following maximum caps:

For native wildlife and for nonnative or exotic wildlife, one thousand dollars per animal not to exceed in the aggregate five thousand dollars per incident; and

For prohibited species, no maximum cap per animal and no maximum cap per incident.

Requirements that owners of alternative livestock have samples taken for the purpose of identifying individual animals;

Perimeter fences for alternative livestock farms, licensed pursuant to article 41.5 of title 35, C.R.S., to prevent ingress of big game wildlife and egress of alternative livestock.

The commission may propose rules concerning:

(I) Hunting of alternative livestock as defined in section 35-41.5-102 (1), C.R.S.;

(II) Maintaining the purity of the native species of elk in the elk herds of Colorado by preventing the introduction of red deer or hybrid nonnative species, whether by the importation of untested live animals, gametes, eggs, sperm, or other genetic material, into Colorado. For purposes of this subparagraph (II), "native species of elk" includes those subspecies native to North America including cervus elaphus roosevelti, cervus elaphus nannodes, cervus elaphus nelsoni, cervus elaphus manitobensis, cervus elaphus canadensis, and cervus elaphus merriavi.

The state agricultural commission shall review any rules proposed by the commission and may make recommendations to the commission concerning such rules. The state agricultural commission shall approve all rules promulgated pursuant to this section prior to adoption by the commission.

For purposes of carrying out the rules promulgated pursuant to this section, at any reasonable time during regular business hours, the director or the director's designee shall have free and unimpeded access upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant to:

All buildings, yards, pens, pastures, and other areas in which any alternative livestock is kept, handled, or transported; and

All records required to be kept and to make copies of such records.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the commissioner of agriculture from authorizing, pursuant to section 35-40-101, C.R.S., the taking of depredating animals.

The commission may adopt rules governing wildlife sanctuaries.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 856, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 89:

(1)(f) added, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(3) added, p. 1528, § 2, effective July 1.

Initiated 92:

(1)(a) amended, effective January 14, 1993.

L. 94:

(3)(b) and IP(3)(c) amended and (4) added, p. 1693, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) added, p. 294, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2004:

(6) added, p. 1323, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1207, § 16, effective June 4.

33-1-107. Regulation of areas under wildlife commission control.

The commission shall adopt such rules or regulations as may be reasonably necessary for the administration, protection, and maintenance of all land and water, or interests in land and water, acquired by the commission. The term "interests in land and water", as used in this section, means any and all rights and interests in land or water less than the full fee interest. Specifically, the commission shall have power to adopt rules or regulations upon the following matters:

Maintenance, enhancement, or management of property, vegetation, wildlife, signs, markers, buildings or other structures, and any object of scientific value or interest in any such area;

Restriction, limitation, or prohibition concerning the use of any such area either as to time, manner, permitted activities, or numbers of people;

Necessary sanitation, health, and safety measures.

Rules or regulations that apply to any particular area shall be published as provided in section 33-1-108 and shall be prominently posted at any such area. Absence of posting shall not, however, relieve any person from the responsibility to comply with applicable rules or regulations if such rules or regulations have been published as provided in section 33-1-108.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 857, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-111 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-108. Rule-making procedure - judicial notice of rules.

Rule-making procedures shall be as prescribed in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title. Notice of rules and regulations may also be given such other publicity as the commission may deem desirable.

A certified copy, which may be certified by the director or his designee, of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be prima facie evidence in any court of this state. A printed copy of any rule or regulation purporting or proved to have been adopted and published by the authority of the commission or as published in the code of Colorado regulations in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S., is presumptive evidence of such rule or regulation and of its adoption.

All rules, regulations, and orders of the commission, lawfully adopted and in force on December 31, 1984, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified, or until they have expired, pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 858, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-109 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-109. Office of director of division created. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 858, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1387, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 33-1-114 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-110. Duties of the director of the division - habitat partnership council, program, committee - created - duties.

The director is the head of the division under the direction and supervision of the commission and the executive director and has general supervisory control of and authority over all activities, functions, and employees of the division.

Repealed.

The director shall prepare such reports as the executive director shall require the commission or director to submit.

With the approval of the commission, the director shall authorize such scientific and other studies as are necessary and shall collect, classify, and disseminate statistics, data, and other information which in his discretion will tend to accomplish the objectives of articles 1 to 6 of this title and the state policy set forth in section 33-1-101.

The director shall appoint Colorado wildlife officers and may appoint special wildlife officers to serve without pay, who shall have the powers and authority designated by the director. A special wildlife officer commission shall not be issued until the applicant has submitted to the division an application setting forth his or her qualifications to act as such an officer. Such qualifications shall include a minimum of forty hours of continuing law enforcement education per calendar year. The director may revoke the special wildlife officer commission of any such person at his or her pleasure.

The director and the executive director shall consult with the commission in the establishment of the division's budget and the expenditures of all moneys appropriated to the division by the general assembly.

(6.5) The director, following notification of the commission, shall authorize an expenditure necessary to pay a local governing body for expenses incurred pursuant to section 35-5.5-110 (3), C.R.S.

(6.7) The director shall certify to the state controller that commitment or payment vouchers submitted by local habitat partnership committees are consistent with distribution management plans and guidelines approved by the commission. Such certification is the only requirement necessary to authorize the state controller to disburse funds from the habitat partnership cash fund.

The director shall appoint a council of nine persons to act as the "habitat partnership council", referred to in this section as the "council". The council has statewide responsibility and authority.

The council shall consist of the following members: Two sports persons who purchase big game licenses on a regular basis in Colorado; two persons representing livestock growers in Colorado; one person from the United States department of agriculture forest service; one person from the United States department of the interior bureau of land management; one person from the Colorado state university range extension program; one person representing agricultural crop producers; and one person from the Colorado division of parks and wildlife. All persons on the council shall be residents of the state of Colorado.

Members of the council who will represent livestock growers and agricultural crop producers shall be chosen by the director from persons nominated by the local habitat partnership committees, pursuant to subparagraph (VI) of paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of this section.

For the initial appointments to the council, the terms of the four members representing sports persons and livestock growers shall be two years for one member of each group and four years for the other member of each group, after which all appointments shall be for four years. The term lengths for the members representing the various agencies shall be at the discretion of the respective agencies. There shall be no limit on the number of terms a member may serve.

The duties of the council are:

To advise local habitat partnership committees;

To assist in the dissemination of information concerning the habitat partnership program;

To review draft plans for compliance with program guidelines established by the commission and to recommend appropriate action by the commission;

To monitor program effectiveness and to propose to the commission changes in guidelines and land acquisition planning and review as appropriate;

To advise the director whether or not payment vouchers submitted by local habitat partnership committees are consistent with distribution management plans approved by the commission;

To report to the commission and to the senate agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee and the house of representatives agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee pursuant to section

33-1-112 (8)

;

To allocate an annual budget to each local habitat partnership committee and submit each committee's budget for the director's final approval; and

To expend money as necessary in areas that are not covered by a local habitat partnership committee formed pursuant to subsection (8)(b) of this section to reduce wildlife and land management conflicts as the conflicts relate to big game ungulate species forage and fence issues, assist with private land conservation efforts, enhance wildlife migration corridors, and implement other management objectives.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1727, § 1, effective June 3, 1996.)

The habitat partnership program is hereby created to assist the division in its duties as deemed appropriate by the director:

By working with private land managers, public land management agencies, sports persons, and other interested parties to reduce wildlife conflicts, particularly those associated with forage and fence issues related to big game ungulate species;

By assisting the division in meeting game management objectives;

By assisting with private land conservation efforts; and

In enhancing wildlife migration corridors.

The director may appoint a "habitat partnership committee", referred to in this subsection (8) as a "committee", in any area of the state where conflicts between wildlife and private land owners and managers engaged in the management of public and private land exist, as the conflicts relate to big game ungulate species forage and fence issues.

A committee shall consist of the following members: One sports person who purchases big game licenses on a regular basis in Colorado; three persons representing livestock growers in the area of the state in which the committee is being established; one person from each of the federal agencies that has land management responsibilities in such area of the state; and one person from the Colorado division of parks and wildlife. All persons on any such committee shall be residents of the state of Colorado.

Commencing on August 10, 2022, committee members serve for set terms as determined by the director. In setting committee members' terms, the director must provide for the staggering of committee members' terms and may allow committee members to serve an unlimited number of terms.

The duties of a committee are the following:

To develop big game distribution management plans to resolve rangeland forage, growing hay crop, harvested crop aftermath grazing, and fence conflicts subject to commission approval;

To monitor program effectiveness and to propose to the council changes in guidelines and land acquisition planning and review as appropriate;

To request for the committee, on an annual basis, funds from the council consistent with the distribution management plan developed by any such committee;

To expend funds allocated by the council or acquired from other sources as necessary to implement distribution management plans;

To make an annual report of expenditures and accomplishments of the committee to the council by August 15 of each year;

To nominate a person to act as a representative of agricultural livestock growers or crop producers to the habitat partnership council for the area of the state where such committee is organized;

To reduce wildlife and land management conflicts as the conflicts relate to big game ungulate species forage and fence issues, assist with private land conservation efforts, enhance wildlife migration corridors, and achieve other management objectives.

A committee may procure from land owners, land managers, or other providers materials or services as are necessary for carrying out activities identified in the distribution management plans pursuant to subsection (8)(d)(IV) of this section; except that a committee shall certify that a procurement is within the scope of the activities and funding levels authorized in a distribution management plan before procuring the materials or services.

For purposes of purchasing, accounting, and all procurement-related issues, the council and each committee is a separate, distinct, and independent organizational unit.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 858, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 92:

(7) and (8) added, p. 1889, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 96:

(6.5) added, p. 763, § 1, effective May 23; (7) and (8) amended, p. 1727, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2001:

(6.7) added and (7)(b)(II), (7)(c)(V), and (8) amended, p. 697, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.

L. 2002:

(7)(c)(VI) amended, p. 876, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(7)(c)(VI) amended, p. 2013, § 108, effective May 22; (5) amended, p. 1629, § 66, effective August 6; (5) amended, p. 1953, § 47, effective August 6.

L. 2012:

(2) repealed and (6.7), IP(7)(c), and (7)(c)(V) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1207, § 17, effective June 4.

L. 2022:

(7)(a), (8)(a), (8)(b), (8)(d)(VII), and (8)(e) amended and (7)(c)(VII), (7)(c)(VIII), and (8)(c.5) added, (HB 22-1072), ch. 116, p. 541, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-115 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-111. Hearings - administrative law judges.

Every hearing provided for in articles 1 to 6 of this title to be conducted by the commission or the division shall, except as provided in sections 33-4-101 and 33-6-106, be conducted by such agency or an administrative law judge designated by such agency pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., subject to appropriations for such administrative law judges made to the department of personnel, and every hearing shall comply with the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title and the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 859, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 974, § 94, effective March 13.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 666, § 103, effective July 1.

33-1-112. Funds - cost accounting - definition - repeal.

Except as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, sections 33-1-112.5 and 33-6-105, and in part 7 of article 22 of title 39, C.R.S., all moneys received from wildlife license fees, and all moneys from all other wildlife sources, and all interest earned on such moneys shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the wildlife cash fund, which fund is hereby created, and such moneys shall be utilized for expenditures authorized or contemplated by and not inconsistent with the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title for wildlife activities and functions and for the financing of impact assistance grants pursuant to part 3 of article 25 of title 30, C.R.S. All moneys so deposited in the wildlife cash fund shall remain in such fund to be used for the purposes set forth in the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of the state of Colorado or any other fund.

Repealed.

(1.5) (a) Within three days after June 21, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer three million five hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the wildlife cash fund for use by the division to implement its state wildlife action plan and the conservation of native species.

This subsection (1.5) is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

(1.7) (a) Within three days after June 1, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the general fund to the wildlife cash fund. Notwithstanding section 33-1-112.5 (4), the division may use the money to:

Support the goals stated in section 33-12-108 (2)(a)(IV)(C);

Support the needs of backcountry search and rescue activities in accordance with the recommendations of the study completed pursuant to section 33-10-116; and

Cover response costs, equipment, and other related expenses for backcountry search and rescue activities.

This subsection (1.7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

There is hereby created a stores revolving fund in the amount of eight hundred thousand dollars, which amount shall be maintained to acquire stock for warehousing and distributing supplies to operating units of the division. The moneys in such fund shall under no circumstances be used for the payment of operating expenses but shall be maintained intact as a revolving fund of eight hundred thousand dollars, composed of the following assets: Cash, accounts receivable, and inventory supplies. The purpose of the fund is to provide better budgetary control, and nothing contained in this subsection (2) shall authorize the division to make any purchases or acquisitions in any manner except as provided by law.

There is hereby created the vanpool program revolving account. Receipts from participants in vanpools operated by the division shall be deposited to said account and shall be used only to pay the monthly operating and maintenance costs of such vans which are attributable to the use of such motor vehicles in carrying persons to and from work and to pay that portion of the purchase cost of replacement motor vehicles which is attributable to the use of the motor vehicles in carrying persons to and from work.

(3.5) (a) There is hereby created the wildlife management public education fund. Money in the fund consists of the surcharge authorized by section 33-4-102 (8.5), any money the general assembly allocates to the fund, and money collected from gifts, donations, contributions, bequests, grants, and funds or reimbursements made from other sources to the wildlife council created in section 33-4-120.

Money in the wildlife management public education fund is subject to annual appropriation and shall be used by the wildlife council for carrying out its duties as set forth in section 33-4-120, including the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by council members in fulfilling their duties, as approved by the director.

All receipts and interest derived from the investment of moneys in the wildlife management public education fund shall be credited to such fund.

The director of the division, with the consent and approval of the executive director, is authorized and directed to establish an adequate system of accounting which shall provide accurate and timely records of:

All moneys received and from what sources;

All moneys expended and for what purposes;

All licenses that are issued, numbering each type separately.

In his annual budget request to the governor, the executive director shall clearly show the allocations of funds used for wildlife purposes among operations, land acquisition, and capital construction and for any other purposes.

The cost of nongame programs established under articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 shall be borne by the general fund, the Colorado nongame conservation and wildlife restoration cash fund, the wildlife cash fund, and any other sources deemed appropriate by the general assembly.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the wildlife for future generations trust fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly, moneys received from energy or mineral royalties or leases of energy or mineral rights on wildlife properties, and gifts, grants, and donations.

For purposes of this subparagraph (I), "wildlife properties" means state wildlife areas and any other wildlife properties in which the division owns mineral interests.

No less than fifty percent of the total moneys deposited in the fund other than interest shall be accrued and maintained intact, and the remaining balance of the moneys deposited into the fund may be expended subject to appropriation by the general assembly; except that the interest earned on moneys in the fund is continuously appropriated and may be expended on such property operation and maintenance and other wildlife projects and programs as the commission deems appropriate.

There is hereby created a wildlife habitat account in the wildlife for future generations trust fund, created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7). The state treasurer shall deduct five million dollars from the wildlife cash fund, created in subsection (1) of this section, and transfer such sum to the wildlife habitat account. The interest earned on such five million dollars shall be continuously appropriated and shall be used solely for operation and maintenance of properties, leases, and easements owned by the division.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the habitat partnership cash fund. The moneys in the habitat partnership cash fund shall consist of those moneys annually transferred from the wildlife cash fund in accordance with paragraph (e) of this subsection (8) for the partnership program and any gifts, grants, donations, and reimbursements made to the program from other sources. The moneys in the fund shall be used in accordance with the duties of the habitat partnership council as specified in section

33-1-110 (7)

and (8), including, but not limited to, reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by council members in the fulfillment of their duties, as approved by the director. All interest derived from the investment of moneys in the habitat partnership cash fund shall be credited to the fund. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund subject to the limitations provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (8).

Notwithstanding section

24-1-136

(11)(a)(I), the council shall submit an annual report to the commission, the senate and house agriculture committees, and the executive director of the department of natural resources specifically stating the items for which it has expended money from the fund and the purpose of such items.

If the council ceases to exist, all moneys in the habitat partnership cash fund shall revert to the wildlife cash fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1729, § 2, effective June 3, 1996.)

On July 1, 2002, and each year thereafter, there shall be transferred from the wildlife cash fund to the habitat partnership cash fund an amount equal to five percent of the net sales of big game licenses used in the geographic areas represented by local habitat partnership committees from the previous calendar year.

All moneys in the habitat partnership cash fund shall be continuously appropriated to the division of parks and wildlife for the purpose of funding the habitat partnership program.

The balance of unexpended and unencumbered money in the habitat partnership cash fund at the end of each state fiscal year must not exceed the total amount of the wildlife cash fund transfer from the beginning of that state fiscal year. Any amount of unexpended and unencumbered money in the habitat partnership cash fund at the end of a state fiscal year that exceeds the amount transferred to the fund at the beginning of that state fiscal year reverts to the wildlife cash fund.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 859, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1266, § 1, effective January 1, 1988.

L. 89:

(1) and (6) amended and (7) added, p. 1342, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(6) amended, p. 1739, § 4, effective April 3.

L. 92:

(1) amended and (8) added, p. 1891, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 96:

(8) amended, p. 1729, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(3.5) added, p. 855, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3.5) amended, p. 1395, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(7) amended, p. 1365, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2001:

(8)(a) amended and (8)(e) added, p. 699, § 2, effective July 1, 2002.

L. 2002:

(7)(a) and (8)(b) amended, p. 876, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(7)(a) amended, p. 2013, § 109, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(3.5)(a) amended, p. 474, § 4, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2007:

(8)(e)(IV) amended, p. 166, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1588, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2015:

(8)(e)(IV) amended, (SB 15-199), ch. 222, p. 813, § 1, effective May 22; (7)(a) amended, (HB 15-1243), ch. 167, p. 511, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(6) amended, (HB 17-1250), ch. 362, p. 1899, § 3, effective August 9; (7)(a)(III) and (8)(b) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1064, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(b) repealed, (HB 18-1008), ch. 137, p. 895, § 1, effective August 8; (3.5)(a) and (3.5)(b) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1328, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (HB 21-1326), ch. 274, p. 1592, § 2, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(1.7) added, (SB 22-168), ch. 296, p. 2114, § 1, effective June 1; (8)(e)(III) amended and (8)(e)(IV) repealed, (HB 22-1072), ch. 116, p. 542, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-116 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.